Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-515
Evidence; action for damages; what not admitted.

Neither the action taken by the department pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, the findings, if any, of the department upon which such action is based, nor the security filed as provided in the act shall be referred to in any way, nor be any evidence of the negligence or due care of either party, at the trial of any action at law to recover damages.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 15, p. 491;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 45.